Maryland, session 2025, HB1127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–452.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1127*

HOUSE BILL 1127
(A) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2026, EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL DEVELOP
INSTRUCTIONAL CONTENT ON WATER SAFETY AND SWIMMING THAT IS:
(1) INTEGRATED INTO THE HEALTH AND OR PHYSICAL EDUCATION
CURRICULUM FOR EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY; AND
(2) AGE–APPROPRIATE FOR STUDENTS IN ELEMENTARY, MIDDLE,
AND HIGH SCHOOL.
(B) THE INSTRUCTIONAL CONTENT DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE OPPORTUNITIES FOR STUDENTS WITH DISABILITIES,
IF PRACTICABLE.
(C) BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 SCHOOL YEAR, EACH COUNTY BOARD
SHALL IMPLEMENT THE INSTRUCTIONAL CONTENT DEVELOPED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION BY OFFERING THE INSTRUCTIONAL CONTENT AS
PART OF THE HEALTH OR PHYSICAL EDUCATION CURRICULUM AT LEAST ONCE IN
ELEMENTARY, MIDDLE, AND HIGH SCHOOL.
(D) THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE A COUNTY BOARD
TO PROVIDE IN–WATER TRAINING AT A SWIMMING POOL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) On or before December 1, 2025, each county board of education shall
develop a plan to ensure public school students in the county have access to swimming pools
for swimming and taking swimming and water safety courses.
(2) The plan required under this subsection shall:
(i) identify strategies to maximize public and private resources to
provide access to swimming pools and related facilities for public school students;
(ii) identify public and private entities in the local community that
could partner with schools to offer access to swimming pools and related facilities to public
school students during school operating hours;
(iii) identify methods to increase public school student access to
swimming pools and related facilities, including costs and transportation, while keeping
costs low; and
(iv) recommend any necessary changes to policy or law to implement
the plan required under paragraph (1) of this subsection and the requirements of § 7–452
of the Education Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.

HOUSE BILL 1127 3
(b) On or before December 15, 2025, each county board shall submit a copy of the
plan developed under subsection (a) of this section to the State Department of Education.
(c) On or before January 1, 2026, the State Department of Education shall
compile the reports submitted under subsection (b) of this section and submit a report that
includes all the county boards’ plans to the General Assembly, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the
end of June 30, 2026, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the General
Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.